src/scripts/Croatian/numbers.foma
# SPDX-License-Identifier: GPL-3.0-or-later

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# Copyright (C) 2024 Zvonimir Stanecic and Darko Milosevic

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, version 3.0 of the License.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Affero General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define nogenderUnit 
%0: нула |
3:три | 
4:четири | 
5:пет | 
6:шест | 
7:седам | 
8:осам | 
9:девет ; 

define MascUnit 
1:један | #, једна,једно
2:два  | #, двије, два
nogenderUnit;

define FemUnit 
1:једна |
2:двије | 
nogenderUnit;

define MaleOrdUnit 
1:први | 
2:други | 
3:трећи | 
4:четврти | 
5:пети | 
6:шести | 
7:седми | 
8:осми | 
9:девети ; 

define FemaleOrdUnit 
1:прва | 
2:друга | 
3:трећа | 
4:четврта | 
5:пета | 
6:шеста | 
7:седма | 
8:осма | 
9:девета ; 

define NeuterOrdUnit 
1:прво | 
2:друго | 
3:треће | 
4:четврто | 
5:пето | 
6:шесто | 
7:седмо | 
8:осмо | 
9:девето ; 

define Teen 
1:једанаест| #, једна,једно
2:дванаест | #, двије, два
3:тринаест | 
4:четрнаест | 
5:петнаест | 
6:шеснаест | 
7:седамнаест | 
8:осамнаест | 
9:деветнаест; 

define MaleOrdTeen 
1:једанаести | 
2:дванаести | 
3:тринаести | 
4:четрнаести | 
5:петнаести | 
6:шеснаести | 
7:седамнаести | 
8:осамнаести | 
9:деветнаести ; 

define FemaleOrdTeen 
1:једанаеста | 
2:дванаеста | 
3:тринаеста | 
4:четрнаеста | 
5:петнаеста | 
6:шеснаеста | 
7:седамнаеста | 
8:осамнаеста | 
9:деветнаеста ; 

define NeuterOrdTeen 
1:једанаесто | 
2:дванаесто | 
3:тринаесто | 
4:четрнаесто | 
5:петнаесто | 
6:шеснаесто | 
7:седамнаесто | 
8:осамнаесто | 
9:деветнаесто ; 

define Ten 
1:десет | 
2:двадесет | 
3:тридесет | 
4:четрдесет | 
5:педесет | 
6:шездесет | 
7:седамдесет | 
8:осамдесет | 
9:деведесет ; 

define MaleOrdTen 
1:десети | 
2:двадесети | 
3:тридесети | 
4:четрдесети | 
5:педесети | 
6:шездесети | 
7:седамдесети | 
8:осамдесети | 
9:деведесети ; 

define FemaleOrdTen 
1:десета | 
2:двадесета | 
3:тридесета | 
4:четрдесета | 
5:педесета | 
6:шездесета | 
7:седамдесета | 
8:осамдесета | 
9:деведесета ; 

define NeuterOrdTen 
1:десето | 
2:двадесето | 
3:тридесето | 
4:четрдесето | 
5:педесето | 
6:шездесето | 
7:седамдесето | 
8:осамдесето | 
9:деведесето ; 

define Hundred 
1:сто | 
2:двјесто | 
3:тристо | 
4:четиристо | 
5:петсто | 
6:шестсто | 
7:седамсто | 
8:осамсто | 
9:деветсто ; 

define MaleOrdHundred 
1:стоти | 
2:двјестоти | 
3:тристоти | 
4:четиристоти | 
5:петстоти | 
6:шестстоти | 
7:седамстоти | 
8:осамстоти | 
9:деветстоти ; 

define FemaleOrdHundred 
1:стота | 
2:двјестота | 
3:тристота | 
4:четиристота | 
5:петстота | 
6:шестстота | 
7:седамстота | 
8:осамстота | 
9:деветстота ; 

define NeuterOrdHundred 
1:стото | 
2:двјестото | 
3:тристото | 
4:четиристото | 
5:петстото | 
6:шестстото | 
7:седамстото | 
8:осамстото | 
9:деветстото ; 

define TenOrHundredSymbol ten|hnd ; 

# ----------------------------
define NZDigit 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9 ; 
define Digit %0|NZDigit ; 

source Ordinals.foma

define UnformattedNumber %0 | [NZDigit Digit^<15] ; 
define FormattedNumber NZDigit Digit^<3 [%. Digit^3]^{1,4} ; 
define RegularDecimal [FormattedNumber|UnformattedNumber] %, Digit+;   #  3.000.320(,022)
define ForeignDecimal UnformattedNumber %. [Digit^<3 | Digit^>3];   # foreign DP 1.02
define Ordinal [FormattedNumber|UnformattedNumber]  OrdSuffix ;   #  number (has to be without commas) followed by ordinal marker
define ArabicNumber UnformattedNumber | FormattedNumber | RegularDecimal | ForeignDecimal | Ordinal;

# tag valid numbers
define tagNumberTypes 
  [FormattedNumber|UnformattedNumber] @-> ... wnum || .#. _ (%, Digit+)  .#. ,,  #  3.000.320(,022)
	UnformattedNumber @-> ... wnum || .#. _ (%. Digit+)  .#.  ,,   # foreign DP 1.02
 UnformattedNumber @-> ... wnum || .#. _ (%. [Digit^{1,2} | Digit^>3])  .#.  ,,   # foreign DP 1.02
 [FormattedNumber|UnformattedNumber] @-> ... wnum ord || .#. _ [%. | OrdSuffix] .#. ;   #  number (has to be without commas) followed by ordinal marker

# We expect this code to be protected from strings contain other than digits, commas and periods.
# We will, however, catch non-numbers which has slipped through, like  20.0.1  or 20,11,111
define tagCascade 
   [  [%,|%.] -> ... dp || wnum  _ Digit+ .#. ]    # place decimal point after whole numbers
  .o. [ [%.]:0  -> || _ ?* wnum ]  #  get rid of the thousands dividers
 .o. [ Digit -> ... dec  || dp Digit* _ .#. ]  # mark decimal
 .o. [ dec -> wnum || dp NZDigit Digit^<3 _ .#. ]  # See (1) below, "Un-Decimalize"  
  .o. [ Digit-> ... wnum || [.#. | \Digit] Digit* _ [ .#. | %. | %, ]];    #  not a whole number, or decimal

# (1) Un-Decimalize For decimal parts, we want any sequence without a leading zero, up to three places, to be read as a whole
# number rather than a list of digits

# by now we have wnum tags for numbers which should be read as whole numbers, dec for those which should be treated differently,# ord tag after wnum, and periods and commas dotted about. 

define tagRules  tagNumberTypes .o. tagCascade; 

# For whole numbers change the markers for singles
define preTranslate 
[1 thns] -> [1 thn] || _ ,,
  [2 thns] -> [2 thnss] || _ ,,
  [3 thns] -> [3 thnss] || _ ,,
  [4 thns] -> [4 thnss] || _ ,,
  [1 mlns] -> [1 mln] || _ ,,
  [1 blns] -> [1 bln] || _ ,,
  [2 blns] -> [2 blnss] || _ ,,
  [3 blns] -> [3 blnss] || _ ,,
  [4 blns] -> [4 blnss] || _ ,,
  [1 tlns] -> [1 tln] || _ ;
#----------------------------

define PowerOfThousandSymbol thns|mlns|blns|tlns|thn|thnss|mln|bln|blnss|tln ; 
define PowerOfTenSymbol TenOrHundredSymbol|PowerOfThousandSymbol ; 

# define SeparatePowerOfThousands(s) [..] -> s || Digit _ Digit^3 wnum  ; 
 define SeparatePowerOfThousand(s) [..] -> s || Digit _ Digit^3 [\dec & \Digit]  ; 

define PowerOfThousandSymbolsToSingular 
[mlns:mln|blns:bln|tlns:tln] -> || [[PowerOfThousandSymbol ]|wnum] 1 _ ; 

define RemoveSilentGroups 
%0^3 (PowerOfThousandSymbol) @-> 0 || _ ?* wnum ; 

define SeparateHundreds 
[..] -> hnd ||  Digit _ Digit^2 ?* wnum; 

define Mark100s 
hnd -> hnd0 || 1 _ {00} ; 

define SeparateTens 
[..] -> ten ||  Digit _ Digit ?* wnum; 

define RemoveZeros 
%0  (TenOrHundredSymbol) @-> 0 || _ ?* wnum; 

define MarkTeens 
[[1 ten]:0] NZDigit [0:[teen %0]] -> ; 

define RemoveOnes 
1 -> 0 || .#. _ thn ; 

define  processOrdinals 
# first the indefs, then the defs. Because we need to output whole words as symbols, we cannot build up these forms using syntactical rules. Ironic.
 MaleOrdUnit ->  ||  _ wnum ord MaleOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 FemaleOrdUnit ->  ||  _ wnum ord FemaleOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 NeuterOrdUnit ->  ||  _ wnum ord NeuterOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [MaleOrdTeen teen:0]->  ||  _ wnum ord MaleOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [FemaleOrdTeen teen:0] ->  ||  _ wnum ord FemaleOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [NeuterOrdTeen teen:0] ->  ||  _ wnum ord NeuterOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [MaleOrdTen ten:0] ->  ||  _ wnum ord MaleOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [FemaleOrdTen ten:0] ->  ||  _ wnum ord FemaleOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [NeuterOrdTen ten:0] ->  ||  _ wnum ord NeuterOrdSuffix .#. ,,
 [MaleOrdHundred [hnd|hnds]:0] ->  ||  _  wnum ord MaleOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [FemaleOrdHundred [hnd|hnds]:0] ->  ||  _  wnum ord FemaleOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [NeuterOrdHundred [hnd|hnds]:0] ->  ||  _  wnum ord NeuterOrdSuffix .#. ;

define Translate 
 [
 MascUnit -> || _ wnum | dec | [PowerOfThousandSymbol  - thn - thns - thnss - bln - blns - blnss]  ,, 
 FemUnit -> || _  [thn | thns | thnss | bln | blns | blnss] ,, 
 MascUnit -> || dp Digit* _ Digit* dec ,,   # right of decimal point
 Teen [teen:0] -> || _ ,, 
 Ten [ten:0] -> || _ ,, 
	Hundred [hnd:0] -> || _ ,, 
	%, ->  зарез || _ ?+ .#. ,, 
	%. ->  точка || _ ?+ .#. ,, 
 [[thns|thnss|thn]:тисућити|[mlns|mln]:милијунти|[blns|blnss|bln]:милијардити|[tlns|tln]:милијунти] @->  ||  _  wnum ord MaleOrdSuffix ,, 
 [[thns|thnss|thn]:тисућита|[mlns|mln]:милијунта|[blns|blnss|bln]:милијардита|[tlns|tln]:билијунта] @->  ||  _  wnum ord FemaleOrdSuffix ,, 
 [[thns|thnss|thn]:тисућито|[mlns|mln]:милијунто|[blns|blnss|bln]:милијардито|[tlns|tln]:билијунто] @->  ||  _  wnum ord NeuterOrdSuffix 
 ]
 .o. [ 
	[thn:тисућу | mln:милијун | bln:милијарда | tln:билијун] -> || _    ,, 
	[thns:тисућа | thnss:тисуће | mlns:милијуна | blns:милијарди | blnss:милијарде | tlns:билијуна] ->  || _  
	]; 

define NumberRules 
SeparatePowerOfThousand(thns)  .o. 
 SeparatePowerOfThousand(mlns) .o. 
SeparatePowerOfThousand(blns) .o. 
SeparatePowerOfThousand(tlns)  .o. 
RemoveSilentGroups .o. 
SeparateHundreds  .o. 
SeparateTens  .o. 
    #MarkOrdPowerOfThousand .o.
 MarkTeens .o.  
 RemoveZeros  .o. 
 PowerOfThousandSymbolsToSingular .o. 
 preTranslate .o.  
  RemoveOnes   .o.
  processOrdinals 
	
	.o. [%.|%,|wnum] -> нула ... || .#. _   # hack to replace lost zero in front of dec. point
   .o. Translate   .o. [ [ord OrdSuffix]:0 -> || wnum _ .#. ]
	
   .o. 	[dp:0|dec:0|wnum:0] -> || _;

# Thousand should be replaced with thousands after 21, 31, etc

define replaceOneThousand 
[једна тисућу] -> [једна тисућа] || _ ;

source romans.foma
regex ConvertRomanToDecimal .o. ArabicNumber .o. tagRules .o. NumberRules .o. replaceOneThousand ; 
